Florida, session 2026, SB1264.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (19) of 18 section 1002.42, Florida Statutes, to read: 19 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 20 (19)âFACILITIES.â 21 (d)1.âA private school enrolling 150 or fewer students is 22 considered a permitted use in all zoning districts, except 23 residential districts, within a county or a municipality without 24 rezoning or obtaining a special exception or a land use change 25 and without complying with any mitigation requirements, 26 conditions, performance standards, ordinances, rules, codes, or 27 policies. 28 2.âA private school enrolling 150 or fewer students may 29 operate in a facility that is subject to and complies with the 30 same occupancy requirements as a class A-1, A-3, B, or M 31 occupancy as defined by the Florida Building Code and may not be 32 subjected to any additional state or local health, safety, or 33 welfare laws, codes, or rules beyond those applicable to a class 34 A-1, A-3, B, or M occupancy facility. 35 3.âThe local fire official shall use the firesafety 36 evaluation systems found in NFPA 101A: Guide on Alternative 37 Approaches to Life Safety for existing facilities as low cost, 38 reasonable alternatives to firesafety evaluation system 39 standards. 40 4.âA private school enrolling 150 or fewer students opening 41 inside, or moving operations to, an existing assembly, day care, 42 mercantile, or business occupancy, as defined by the Florida 43 Fire Prevention Code, must meet standards for existing 44 educational occupancy requirements under chapter 15 of the 45 Florida Fire Prevention Code for automatic sprinkler, detection, 46 alarm, and communications systems and requirements for hazardous 47 areas, except that an automatic sprinkler system must be 48 provided for educational occupancies as follows: 49 a.âThroughout all Group E fire areas greater than 12,000 50 square feet, as defined by the International Building Code. 51 b.âThroughout every portion of educational buildings below 52 the level of exit discharge. 53 c.âAn automatic sprinkler system is not required in any 54 fire area or area below the level of exit discharge where every 55 classroom throughout the building has at least one exterior exit 56 door at ground level without intervening corridors, passageways, 57 interior exit stairways or ramps, or exit passageways. 58 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.